New York, session 2025-2026, A7485.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6303 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other general, special or 4 local law, rule or regulation, community colleges offering an associates 5 degree program in nursing may offer a four-year bachelors degree program 6 in nursing. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10724-01-5